Hawaii statutes.
§653-5 Complaint. The creditor of such
beneficiary may bring the creditor's action against the creditor's debtor, and
in the creditor's complaint allege, to the best of the creditor's knowledge:

(1) The office or employment held or pursued by the
beneficiary, in or under what department, board, or bureau of government or
subdivision of the State, where the beneficiary is resident and where chiefly
so employed;

(2) The amount of the monthly salary, wages, or
stipend or the annual salary of the beneficiary; and

(3) The name of the officer through whom the
beneficiary is accustomed or entitled to draw the beneficiary's salary,
stipend, wages, or annuity. [L 1890, c 50, §3; am L 1903, c 53, §2; am L 1921,
c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2848; RL 1935, §4294; RL 1945, §10325; RL 1955, §238-5; HRS
§653-5; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

In paragraph (2), "and" added after ending
punctuation pursuant to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Summons should not be quashed because declaration omits some
statutory allegations if enough remains. 19 H. 387 (1909).

Statute authorizes naming auditor of Territory and clerk of
senate in garnishee process. 19 H. 428, 430 (1909).

Cited: 23 H. 564, 566 (1916); 33 H. 602, 604 (1935).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next